Indiana, session 2026, HB1013.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 16-18-2-302.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 302.7. "Qualified substance", for
purposes of IC 16-18-5, has the meaning set forth in IC 16-18-5-1.
SECTION 2. IC 16-18-5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]:
Chapter 5. Exemptions from Qualified Substances
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "qualified substance" means a
substance, including an immunization, for which a person has been
granted immunity from civil liability under a state or federal
statute for an act or omission performed in connection with the
manufacturing, distribution, administration, or storage of the
substance.
Sec. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, an individual may not be
required to:
(1) inject;
2026 IN 1013—LS 6020/DI 141


(2) receive an injection of;
(3) ingest;
(4) inhale; or
(5) otherwise incorporate;
a qualified substance into the individual's body.
2026 IN 1013—LS 6020/DI 141